Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0249.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14q. (1) Not later than 30 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall create a low-income water residential affordability program task force. (2) The director of the department shall appoint members of the task force that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Representatives of a provider with a population served of less than 3,300. (b) Representatives of a provider with a population served of between 3,300 and 10,000. (c) Representatives of a provider with a population served of over 10,000. (d) Representatives of water and sewerage consumer advocacy groups. (e) Representatives of community action agencies. (f) Representatives of municipal governments. (g) Representatives of small rural counties and suburban and urban areas. (h) Representatives of environmental groups. (3) The task force shall do all of the following: (a) Discuss, and advise the department on, best practices for administering the affordability program. (b) Not later than 9 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, develop further guidance for the affordability program. The department shall implement this guidance not later than 18 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (c) Work with the department to develop educational outreach materials about the affordability program. (d) Seek additional funding sources for the affordability program. (e) Explore ways to expand the affordability program to include more types of providers. (f) Review and make recommendations to the department regarding any potential changes to the water usage limits described in section 14o(17). (g) Not later than 9 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, develop and recommend to the department criteria for reviewing and approving a low-income water residential affordability program for a provider that creates and implements its own program under section 14s. (4) The department shall collaborate with the department of treasury to distribute funding from the fund to the providers to make up the difference between the total of customers' actual water, sewerage, and stormwater bill and the total discounted water and sewerage bills provided through the affordability program or a provider's low-income water residential affordability program. The department shall collaborate with the department of treasury to distribute funds to assist with plumbing repairs and other repairs necessary as described in section 14o(16). The department of treasury shall set aside a specific funding amount for plumbing repairs. (5) The department shall collaborate with the department of treasury to distribute funds to third-party organizations that the department collaborates with to administer the affordability program to cover the administrative costs. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 248. (b)    Senate Bill No. 250. (c) Senate Bill No. 252.